New Mexico, session 2026, HB305.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF NEW MEXICO: SECTION 1. APPROPRIATION.--One hundred fifty thousand dollars ($150,000) is appropriated from the general fund to the board of regents of the university of New Mexico for expenditure in fiscal year 2027 for the bureau of business and economic research to study the general feasibility of state acquisition and operation of an electric utility for the purpose of creating a publicly owned electric utility. Any unexpended balance remaining at the end of fiscal year 2027 shall revert to the general fund.